Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-4901
Climate Assessment Response Committee; created; members; expenses; meetings; termination.

(1) The Climate Assessment Response Committee is hereby created. The office of the Governor shall be the lead agency and shall oversee the committee and its activities. The committee shall be composed of representatives appointed by the Governor with the approval of a majority of the Legislature from livestock producers, crop producers, the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency, and the Conservation and Survey Division and Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Nebraska. The Director of Agriculture or his or her designee, the chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services or his or her designee, and the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment or his or her designee shall be ex officio members of the committee. Representatives from the federal Consolidated Farm Service Agency and Federal Crop Insurance Corporation may also serve on the committee at the invitation of the Governor. The chairperson of the Committee on Agriculture of the Legislature and the chairperson of the Committee on Natural Resources of the Legislature shall be nonvoting, ex officio members of the committee. The Governor may appoint a member of the Governor's Policy Research Office and any other state agency representatives or invite any other federal agencies to name representatives as he or she deems necessary. The Governor shall appoint one of the Climate Assessment Response Committee members to serve as the chairperson of the committee. Committee members shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(2) The committee shall meet at least twice each year and shall meet more frequently (a) at the call of the chairperson, (b) upon request of a majority of the committee members, and (c) during periods of drought or other severe climate situations.

(3) The chairperson may establish subcommittees and may invite representatives of agencies other than those with members on the committee to serve on such subcommittees.

(4) Any funds for the activities of the committee and for other climate-related expenditures may be appropriated directly to the office of the Governor for contracting with other agencies or persons for tasks approved by the committee.

(5) The Climate Assessment Response Committee terminates on July 1, 2026. Sections 2-4901 and 2-4902 terminate on July 1, 2026.

Laws 1992, LB 274, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 43;

Laws 1999, LB 403, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 63;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB389, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 34;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 4.